District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

18-514

Wills filed prior to June 8, 1898, may be probated as of real estate

Repealed.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 203c, 27 DCR 2155

History

1981 Ed., §§ 18-501 to 18-514.

Prior Codifications